src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VINFINITES_OPPAD   !!= ** __@CODE@__
+Inf:â^VBACK^RVSH%>đ K ;
!+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:â^WG^VBACK^RLEN K ;
+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:â^WG^VBACK K ;
+Ind+Prt+ConNeg:â^VBACK^RVSH%>m K ;
+Cond+Prs+ConNeg:â^WG^VBACK^RVSH%>ččii K ;
+Pot+Prs+ConNeg:i^VBACK^RVSH%>i3 K ;
+Imprt+ConNeg:â^WG^VBACK^RLEN K ;
+PrsPrc:e^CLEN%>e K ; ! trigger for u > o
+PrfPrc:â^VBACK^RVSH%>m K ;
+Der2+Der/NomAg:e^CLEN%> C_TAHHEE ;

+VAbess:â^WG^VBACK^RVSH VABESS ;
+VGen:â^WG^VBACK^RLEN%>n VGEN ;

+Actio+Nom:â^VBACK^RVSH%>m NOMACT ; ! oppâm
+Actio+Ill:â^VBACK^RVSH%>mân K ;
+Actio+Loc:â^VBACK^RVSH%>mist K ;
+Actio+Com:â^VBACK^RVSH%>máin K ;
+Actio+Ess:â^VBACK^RVSH%>min K ;
+Ger+PxSg1:â^WG^VBACK^RVSH%>dijnân K ;
+Ger+PxSg2:â^WG^VBACK^RVSH%>dijnâd K ;
+Ger+PxSg3+Err/Orth:â^WG^VBACK^RVSH%>dijnes K ;
+Ger+PxSg3:â^WG^VBACK^RVSH%>dijnis K ;
+Ger:â^WG^VBACK^RVSH%>dijn K ;
+Der4+Der/NomAct:â^VBACK^RVSH%>m FLAG_3LITTER ;

LEXICON EVEN_IND_OPPAD   !!= ** __@CODE@__
+Prs+Sg1:â^WG^VBACK^RLEN%>m K ;    	! toolâm ! uá > o
+Prs+Sg2:a^WG^VBACK^RLEN%>h K ;     ! toolah
+Prs+Sg3:á K ;       		! uáppá
+Prs+Du1:e%>en K ;  			! tuálleen
+Prs+Du2:â^VBACK^RVSH%>vettee K ; 	! oppâvettee
+Prs+Du3:â^VBACK^RVSH%>v K ;         ! oppâv
+Prs+Pl1:â^VBACK^RVSH%>p K ;  ! oppâp
+Prs+Pl2:â^VBACK^RVSH%>vetteđ K ; 	 ! oppâvetteđ
+Prs+Pl3:i%>h K ;           ! uáppih

+Prt+Sg1:i^VBACK^RVSH%>m K ;				! oppim
+Prt+Sg2:i^VBACK^RVSH%>h K ;				! oppih
+Prt+Sg3:â^WG^VBACK^RLEN%>i K ;			! oopâi
+Prt+Du1:á^WG^VBACK^RLEN%>im K ; ! oopáim
+Prt+Du2:á^WG^VBACK^RLEN%>id K ; ! oopáid
+Prt+Du3:á^WG^VBACK^RLEN%>in K ;	! oopáin
+Prt+Pl1:â^WG^VBACK^RLEN%>im K ;	! oopáim
+Prt+Pl2:â^WG^VBACK^RLEN%>id K ;	! oopáid
+Prt+Pl3:i^VBACK^RVSH%>i5 K ;			! tollii

LEXICON EVEN_POT_OPPAD !!= ** __@CODE@__
+Sg1:e^WG^CLEN%>em K ; ! uáppeem, suáđheem
+Sg2:e^WG^CLEN%>eh K ; ! uáppeeh, suáđheeh
+Sg3:â^WG^VBACK%>š K ; ! toolâš
+Du1:â^WG^VBACK^RVSH%>žeen K ; ! tolâžeen
+Du2:â^WG^VBACK^RLEN%>švettee K ; ! toolâšvettee
+Du3:â^WG^VBACK^RVSH%>žává K ; ! tolâžává
+Pl1:â^WG^VBACK^RVSH%>žep K ; ! tolâžep
+Pl2:â^WG^VBACK^RLEN%>švetteđ K ; ! toolâšvetteđ
+Pl3:â^WG^VBACK^RVSH%>žeh K ; ! tolâžeh

LEXICON EVEN_IMPRT_OPPAD   !!= ** __@CODE@__
+Sg2:â^WG^VBACK K ; ! toolâ
+Sg3:u^WG%>s K ; ! tuálus
+Du1:o^RVSH%>on K ; ! tuálloon
+Du2:e^RVSH%>e K ; 		! tuállee
+Du3:u%>s K ; 	! tuállus
+Pl1:u%>p K ;	! tuállup
+Pl2:â^VBACK^RVSH%>đ K ; ! oppâđ
+Pl3:u^RLEN%>s K ; ! tuállus




LEXICON 2SYLL_TOOHAD
+V: 2SYLL_TOOHAD_V ;
LEXICON 2SYLL_TOOHAD_IV
+V+IV: 2SYLL_TOOHAD_V ;
LEXICON 2SYLL_TOOHAD_TV
+V+TV: 2SYLL_TOOHAD_V ;

LEXICON 2SYLL_TOOHAD_V  !!= * __@CODE@__ 38 verbs

VINFINITES_MOONNAD ; !po^RVrr
+Ind: EVEN_IND_TOOHAD ;
+Pot+Prs: EVEN_POT_TOOHAD ;
+Cond+Prs:â^WG^VHIGH%> EVEN_COND ;
+Imprt: EVEN_IMPRT_MOONNAD ;
+Der3+Der/Pass:u2 C_PASS_SH_RVSH ;   ! prfprc tohhum, tahhoo always CLEN, RVSH
+Der3+Der/Pass+Use/NG:u2 C_PASS_SH_ALTERNATE ; ! prfprc: toohum, tahhoo ta^RVh^RC â^VHIGH^RLEN%>đ
+Der1+Der/d:âd^WG^VBACK 3_DERIVED_LOW ; ! pu^RVrâd vs po^RVrr, luvâdiđ
+Der1+Der/st:âst^WG^VBACK 3_DERIVED ; ! purâstiđ
+Der1+Der/tt:âtt^WG^VBACK 3_DERIVED ; ! purâttiđ
!DERL+Der1+Der/l:âl 3_DERIVED_L ;
:â^VHIGH DER_MAS ;
+Der4+Der/InchL:â^WG^VHIGH%>škyett4 4SYLL_KYETTID_DER ; ! luvâškyettiđ polâškyettiđ rosâškyettiđ

LEXICON EVEN_IND_TOOHAD  !!= ** __@CODE@__
+Prs+Sg1:â^WG^VHIGH^RLEN%>m K ;
+Prs+Sg2:a^WG^VHIGH^RLEN%>h K ;
+Prs+Sg3:á^CSH K ;
+Prs+Du1:e^CLEN%>en K ;
+Prs+Du2:â^CSH^VHIGH%>vettee K ;
+Prs+Du3:â^VHIGH^RLEN%>v K ;
+Prs+Pl1:â^VHIGH^RLEN%>p K ;
+Prs+Pl2:â^CSH^VHIGH%>vetteđ K ;
+Prs+Pl3:e^CSH%>h K ;             ! loheh

+Prt+Sg1:i^VHIGH^RLEN%>m K ;
+Prt+Sg2:i^VHIGH^RLEN%>h K ;
+Prt+Sg3:â^WG^VHIGH^RLEN%>i K ;
+Prt+Du1:á^WG^CLEN^VHIGH%>im K ;
+Prt+Du2:á^WG^CLEN^VHIGH%>id K ;
+Prt+Du3:á^WG^CLEN^VHIGH%>in K ;
+Prt+Pl1:â^WG^VHIGH^RLEN%>im K ;
+Prt+Pl2:â^WG^VHIGH^RLEN%>id K ;
+Prt+Pl3:i^CLEN^VHIGH%>i3 K ;


LEXICON EVEN_POT_TOOHAD !!= ** __@CODE@__
+Sg1:e^WG^CLEN%>em K ;
+Sg2:e^WG^CLEN%>eh K ;
+Sg3:â^WG^VHIGH^RLEN%>š K ;
+Du1:â^WG^VHIGH%>žeen K ;
+Du2:â^WG^VHIGH^RLEN%>švettee K ;
+Du3:â^WG^VHIGH%>žává K ;
+Pl1:â^WG^VHIGH%>žep K ;
+Pl2:â^WG^VHIGH^RLEN%>švetteđ K ;
+Pl3:â^WG^VHIGH%>žeh K ;

LEXICON 2SYLL_MOONNAD
+V: 2SYLL_MOONNAD_V ;
LEXICON 2SYLL_MOONNAD_IV
+V+IV: 2SYLL_MOONNAD_V ;
LEXICON 2SYLL_MOONNAD_TV
+V+TV: 2SYLL_MOONNAD_V ;

LEXICON 2SYLL_MOONNAD_V  !!= * __@CODE@__ 24 verbs

VINFINITES_MOONNAD ;
+Ind: EVEN_IND_MOONNAD ;
+Pot+Prs: EVEN_POT_MOONNAD ;
+Cond+Prs:â^WG^VHIGH%> EVEN_COND ;
+Imprt: EVEN_IMPRT_MOONNAD ;
+Der3+Der/Pass:u2 C_PASS_SH_RVSH ; !soppum toppuu monnuuččij
+Der4+Der/InchL:â^WG^VHIGH%>škyett4 4SYLL_KYETTID_DER ; ! luvâškyettiđ polâškyettiđ rosâškyettiđ
+Der1+Der/d:âd^WG^VBACK 3_DERIVED_LOW ; !3_DERIVED ; !
+Der1+Der/st:âst^WG^VBACK 3_DERIVED_LOW ; ! 3_DERIVED ; !njomâstiđ
+Der1+Der/tt:âtt^WG^VBACK 3_DERIVED_LOW ; ! 3_DERIVED ; !
!DERL+Der1+Der/l:âl 3_DERIVED_L ;
:â^CSH^VHIGH^RVSH DER_MAS ;

LEXICON VINFINITES_MOONNAD  !!= ** __@CODE@__
+Inf:â^VHIGH^RLEN%>đ K ;

+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:â^WG^VHIGH^RLEN K ;
+Ind+Prt+ConNeg:â^VHIGH^RLEN%>m K ;
+Cond+Prs+ConNeg:â^WG^VHIGH%>ččii K ;
+Pot+Prs+ConNeg:i^WG^VHIGH^RLEN%>i3 K ;
+Imprt+ConNeg:â^WG^VHIGH^RLEN K ; !! nuuvâ, iige noovâ
+PrfPrc:â^VHIGH^RLEN%>m K ;
+PrsPrc:e^CLEN%>e K ; ! trigger for u > o
+Der2+Der/NomAg:e^CLEN%> C_TAHHEE ;

+VAbess:â^WG^VHIGH VABESS ;
+VGen:â^WG^VHIGH^RLEN%>n VGEN ;

+Ger+PxSg1:â^WG^VHIGH%>dijnân K ;
+Ger+PxSg2:â^WG^VHIGH%>dijnâd K ;
+Ger+PxSg3+Err/Orth:â^WG^VHIGH%>dijnes K ;
+Ger+PxSg3:â^WG^VHIGH%>dijnis K ;
+Ger:â^WG^VHIGH%>dijn K ;
+Actio+Ess:â^CSH^VHIGH%>min K ;
+Actio+Ill:â^CSH^VHIGH%>mân K ;
+Actio+Loc:â^CSH^VHIGH%>mist K ;
+Actio+Com:â^CSH^VHIGH%>máin K ;
+Actio+Com+Err/Orth:â^CSH^VHIGH%>mijn K ;
+Actio+Nom:â^VHIGH^RLEN%>m NOMACT ;
+Der4+Der/NomAct:â^VHIGH^RLEN%>m FLAG_3LITTER ;
! Ger missing

LEXICON EVEN_IND_MOONNAD  !!= ** __@CODE@__
+Prs+Sg1:â^WG^VHIGH^RLEN%>m K ;
+Prs+Sg2:a^WG^VHIGH^RLEN%>h K ;
+Prs+Sg3:á^CSH K ;
+Prs+Du1:e^CLEN%>en K ;
+Prs+Du2:â^CSH^VHIGH%>vettee K ;
+Prs+Du3:â^VHIGH^RLEN%>v K ;
+Prs+Pl1:â^VHIGH^RLEN%>p K ;
+Prs+Pl2:â^CSH^VHIGH%>vetteđ K ;
+Prs+Pl3:e^CSH%>h K ;             ! loheh

+Prt+Sg1:i^VHIGH^RLEN%>m K ;
+Prt+Sg2:i^VHIGH^RLEN%>h K ;
+Prt+Sg3:â^WG^VHIGH^RLEN%>i K ;
+Prt+Du1:á^WG^VHIGH^RLEN%>im K ;
+Prt+Du2:á^WG^VHIGH^RLEN%>id K ;
+Prt+Du3:á^WG^VHIGH^RLEN%>in K ;
+Prt+Pl1:â^WG^VHIGH^RLEN%>im K ;
+Prt+Pl2:â^WG^VHIGH^RLEN%>id K ;
+Prt+Pl3:i^VHIGH%>i3 K ;

LEXICON EVEN_IMPRT_MOONNAD  !!= ** __@CODE@__
+Sg2:â^WG^VHIGH^RLEN K ;
+Sg3:o^WG%>s K ;
+Du1:o^CLEN%>on K ;
+Du2:e^CLEN%>e K ;
+Du3:o^CLEN%>os K ;
+Pl1:o^CLEN%>op K ;
+Pl2:â^VHIGH^RLEN%>đ K ;
+Pl3:o^CLEN%>os K ;

LEXICON EVEN_POT_MOONNAD !!= ** __@CODE@__
+Sg1:e^WG^RLEN%>em K ;
+Sg2:e^WG^RLEN%>eh K ;
+Sg3:â^WG^VHIGH^RLEN%>š K ;
+Du1:â^WG^VHIGH%>žeen K ;
+Du2:â^WG^VHIGH^RLEN%>švettee K ;
+Du3:â^WG^VHIGH%>žává K ;
+Pl1:â^WG^VHIGH%>žep K ;
+Pl2:â^WG^VHIGH^RLEN%>švetteđ K ;
+Pl3:â^WG^VHIGH%>žeh K ;

LEXICON 2SYLL_VIIRRAD
+V: 2SYLL_VIIRRAD_V ;
LEXICON 2SYLL_VIIRRAD_IV
+V+IV: 2SYLL_VIIRRAD_V ;
!LEXICON 2SYLL_VIIRRAD_TV
!+V+TV: 2SYLL_VIIRRAD_V ;

LEXICON 2SYLL_VIIRRAD_V  !!= * __@CODE@__ 20 verbs
VINFINITES_VIIRRAD ;
+Ind: EVEN_IND_VIIRRAD ;
+Pot+Prs: EVEN_POT_VIIRRAD ;
+Cond+Prs:â^WG^RVSH%> EVEN_COND ; ! X
+Imprt: EVEN_IMPRT_VIIRRAD ;
+Der4+Der/InchL:â^WG^RVSH%>škyett4 4SYLL_KYETTID_DER ;
+Der1+Der/d:âd^WG 3_DERIVED ; !
+Der1+Der/st:âst^WG 3_DERIVED ; !
+Der1+Der/tt:âtt^WG 3_DERIVED ; !
!DERL+Der1+Der/l:âl 3_DERIVED_L_RLEN_CLEN ;
:â^CSH^RVSH DER_MAS ;
+Der3+Der/Pass:u2 C_PASS_SH_RVSH ; !virruđ
