src/fst/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON Verbs
coohâđ:ca^RVh^RC 2SYLL_TOOHAD_IV ; !¢coovâm
cooijâđ:ca^RVi4j 2SYLL_MOONNAD_TV ; !YAML
coommâđ:ca^RVmm 2SYLL_MOONNAD_IV ;
hoohâđ:huáh^RV 2SYLL_TOOHAD_TV ; ! PM: huáhá, huáh'heen, hoov*âi, hovváim, hoov*âim
huunnjâđ:hu^RVnnj 2SYLL_MOONNAD_IV ;
iiŋŋâđ:i^RVŋŋ 2SYLL_VIIRRAD ;
joorrâđ:ja^RVrr 2SYLL_MOONNAD ;
juuccâđ:ju^RVcc4 2SYLL_MOONNAD ; ! cc-s ¢juusâi jucá juusâi
juuhâđ:ju^RVh^RC 2SYLL_TOOHAD_TV ; !YAML
juullâđ:ju^RVll 2SYLL_VIIRRAD ;
juummâđ:ju^RVmm 2SYLL_VIIRRAD ;
juurrâđ:jo^RVrr 2SYLL_MOONNAD_IV ;
kiiccâđ:ki^RVcc4 2SYLL_VIIRRAD ; ! cc-s
kiihâđ:ki^RVh^RC 2SYLL_VIIRRAD ;
kiimmâđ:ki^RVmm 2SYLL_VIIRRAD ;
kiinnâđ:ki^RVnn 2SYLL_VIIRRAD ;
kooccâđ:ka^RVcc4 2SYLL_MOONNAD_TV ; ! cc-s ¢koosâm kaca
koorrâđ:ka^RVrr 2SYLL_MOONNAD_IV ;
kuullâđ+Hom1:ku^RVll 2SYLL_MOONNAD_TV ; !Sg3 kulá YAML, PM: Du kuuláim, not kulláim
kuullâđ+Hom2:ko^RVll 2SYLL_MOONNAD_TV ; !Sg3 kolá YAML, PM: Du kuuláim, not kulláim
kuuppâđ:ko^RVpp4 2SYLL_MOONNAD_TV ; !¢kuuvâm kopá
kuussâđ:ko^RVss 2SYLL_MOONNAD_IV ;
kuuđđâđ:ko^RVđđ 2SYLL_MOONNAD ; !¢ kuuđâm kođá
loommâđ:la^RVmm 2SYLL_MOONNAD_IV ;
luuhâđ:lo^RVh^RC 2SYLL_TOOHAD_TV ; ! loheh !YAML
luuppâđ:lo^RVpp4 2SYLL_MOONNAD_TV ; !¢luuvâm lopá
maŋasmoonnâđ:maŋas#ma^RVnn 2SYLL_MOONNAD ;
moonnâđ:ma^RVnn 2SYLL_MOONNAD_IV ; ! maneh NJUNE !YAML
muullâđ:mo^RVll 2SYLL_MOONNAD ;
muuttâđ:mo^RVtt 2SYLL_MOONNAD ; !¢motá
niirrâđ:ni^RVrr 2SYLL_VIIRRAD ;
njiihâđ:nji^RVh^RC 2SYLL_VIIRRAD_IV ;
njiittâđ:nji^RVtt4 2SYLL_VIIRRAD ;
njooccâđ:nja^RVcc4 2SYLL_MOONNAD ; ! cc-s ¢njoosâm njaca
njoollâđ:nja^RVll 2SYLL_MOONNAD ; ! njala
njoommâđ:nja^RVmm 2SYLL_MOONNAD_TV ;
njuuppâđ:njo^RVpp4 2SYLL_MOONNAD ; !¢njuuvâm njopá
nooijâđ:na^RVi4j 2SYLL_MOONNAD ;
noollâđ:na^RVll 2SYLL_MOONNAD_TV ;
nuuhâđ:no^RVh^RC 2SYLL_TOOHAD_IV ;
nuurrâđ:no^RVrr 2SYLL_MOONNAD_TV ;
piiccâđ:pi^RVcc4 2SYLL_VIIRRAD ; ! cc-s
poollâđ:pa^RVll 2SYLL_MOONNAD_TV ;
poossâđ:pa^RVss 2SYLL_MOONNAD_TV ;
puuhâđ:po^RVh^RC 2SYLL_TOOHAD ;
puunnjâđ:po^RVnnj 2SYLL_MOONNAD_TV ;
puurrâđ:po^RVrr 2SYLL_MOONNAD_TV ; 
roohâđ:ra^RVh^RC 2SYLL_TOOHAD_IV ; ! ¢roovâm raha
roossâđ:ra^RVss 2SYLL_MOONNAD ;
roottâđ:ra^RVtt4 2SYLL_MOONNAD ;
siillâđ:si^RVll 2SYLL_VIIRRAD ;
siittâđ:si^RVtt4 2SYLL_VIIRRAD ;
skiippâđ:ski^RVpp4 2SYLL_VIIRRAD ;
soohâđ:sa^RVh^RC 2SYLL_TOOHAD ; !¢ soovâm saha
soollâđ:sa^RVll 2SYLL_MOONNAD ;
sooŋŋâđ:sa^RVŋŋ 2SYLL_MOONNAD ;
spiiđđâđ:spi^RVđđ 2SYLL_VIIRRAD ;
stuullâđ:stu^RVll 2SYLL_MOONNAD_IV ;
stuuččâđ:stu^RVčč4 2SYLL_TOOHAD_IV ; !¢ stuujâm
suuijâđ:so^RVi4j 2SYLL_MOONNAD ;
suunnâđ:so^RVnn 2SYLL_MOONNAD ;
suuppâđ:so^RVpp4 2SYLL_MOONNAD ; !¢ suuvâm sopá
suurrâđ:so^RVrr 2SYLL_MOONNAD_TV ; !¢sorá
tiippâđ:ti^RVpp 2SYLL_VIIRRAD ;
tuuppâđ:to^RVpp4 2SYLL_MOONNAD ; !¢topá
tuuttâđ:to^RVtt4 2SYLL_MOONNAD_IV ;
tuuŋŋâđ:to^RVŋŋ 2SYLL_MOONNAD_IV ; !¢ toŋá
uuccâđ+v1:o^RVcc4 2SYLL_MOONNAD_TV ; ! cc-s ¢uusâm ocá
uuccâđ+v2:o^RVcc4 2SYLL_TOOHAD_TV ; ! cc-s ¢uusâm ocá, PM: with c:s words, Prt.du uusáim ~ ussáim
uussâđ+v1:o^RVss 2SYLL_MOONNAD ;
uussâđ+v2:o^RVss 2SYLL_TOOHAD ;
viillâđ:vi^RVll 2SYLL_VIIRRAD ;
viippâđ:vi^RVpp4 2SYLL_VIIRRAD_IV ;
viirrâđ:vi^RVrr 2SYLL_VIIRRAD ;
vooijâđ:va^RVi4j 2SYLL_MOONNAD_TV ; !¢voojâm vaja
voonnâđ:va^RVnn 2SYLL_MOONNAD ;
čoollâđ:ča^RVll 2SYLL_MOONNAD ;
čoonnâđ:ča^RVnn 2SYLL_MOONNAD_TV ;
čuuhâđ:čo^RVh^RC 2SYLL_TOOHAD ;
šnjuuđđâđ:šnjo^RVđđ 2SYLL_MOONNAD ; !¢ šnjuuđâm
šoollâđ+v1:ša^RVll 2SYLL_MOONNAD ;
šuuvvâđ:šu^RVvv 2SYLL_MOONNAD_IV ;
